Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.260

Urban forestry ordinances.

(1) Any county may adopt urban forestry ordinances, as that term is defined in RCW 76.15.010, which the county must apply to new building or land development in the unincorporated portions of the county's urban growth areas, as that term is defined in RCW 36.70A.030, and may apply to other areas of the county as deemed appropriate by the county.

(2) As an alternative to subsection (1) of this section, a city or town may request that the county in which it is located apply to any new building or land development permit in the unincorporated portions of the urban growth areas, as defined in RCW 36.70A.030, the urban forestry ordinances standards adopted under RCW 76.15.090 by the city or town in the county located closest to the proposed building or development.

[ 2021 c 209 s 20; 2008 c 299 s 15.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 209: See note following RCW 76.15.005.

Short title—2008 c 299: See note following RCW 76.15.020.